Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.300

Grounds for granting writ—Affidavit.

It may be issued by any court, except district or municipal courts, to an inferior tribunal, or to a corporation, board or person, in all cases where there is not a plain, speedy and adequate remedy in the ordinary course of law. It is issued upon affidavit, on the application of the person beneficially interested.

[ 1987 c 202 s 132; 1895 c 65 s 30; RRS s 1028.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.